Utah statutes.
39-7-109.   Duration of stays.

(1)  Any stay of any action, proceeding, attachment, or execution, ordered by any court under the provisions of this chapter may be ordered for the period of military service plus 60 days after its termination or any part of that time period.

(2)  Where the service member in military service is a codefendant with others, the plaintiff may, with leave of the court, proceed against the others.

